Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-138
Private club or establishment not open to public; applicability of sections.

The provisions of sections 20-132 to 20-143 shall not apply to a private club or other establishment not in fact open to the public, except to the extent that the facilities of such establishments are made available to the customers or patrons of an establishment within the scope of section 20-133.

Laws 1973, LB 112, § 7.